Alabama, session 2026rs, HB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
39 Section 1. Sections 40-17-168.5, 40-17-335, and
40 40-17-353, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
41 follows:
42 "§40-17-168.5
43 (a) Upon approval of the application by the department,
44 the applicant must file with the department a surety bond. The
45 bond amount for an applicant for a license as a public seller
46 of CNG/LNG or a fleet producer of CNG/LNG shall be a minimum
47 of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or in the
48 approximate amount of twice the average monthly tax liability,
49 whichever is greater.
50 (b) The department shall review the bond amounts every
51 five years beginning January 2023 to ensure that each public
52 seller of CNG/LNG and each fleet producer of CNG/LNG has
53 posted a surety bond sufficient to cover twice the average
54 monthly tax liability as referenced in subdivision (a). Based
55 upon this review, or if at any time that the department
56 determines that the bond amount is insufficient to cover twice
Page 2

determines that the bond amount is insufficient to cover twice
HB114 INTRODUCED
57 the average monthly tax liability, the commissioner may
58 require an additional surety bond from any licensee ifunder
59 one or more of the following circumstances:
60 (1) The commissioner determines that the surety on an
61 existing bond is unsatisfactory.;
62 (2) A surety notifies the department that it intends to
63 cancel a bond as provided in subsection (d).; or
64 (3) The commissioner, after reviewing the payment
65 history of the licensee, determines that the existing bond of
66 the licensee is insufficient in an amount to insure the prompt
67 payment of all excise taxes that are due or may become due to
68 the state by the licensee upon the sale or withdrawal of
69 compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas. However, in
70 no case shall a new or additional bond be more than two months
71 of average excise tax owed by the licensee.
72 (c)(1) The department shall notify a licensee at his or
73 her last known address by first class U.S. mail or, at the
74 option of the department, certified mail, return receipt
75 requested, that it is requiring such new or additional bond
76 for any reason as provided abovein subsection(b), and the
77 licensee, within 3060 days from the date the notice is mailed
78 by the department, shall do either of the following:
79 a. File the new or additional bond as requested by the
80 department.; or
81 b. File a notice of appeal with the Alabama Tax
82 Tribunal as allowed in Chapter 2A.
83 (2) The department may immediately cancel the
84 licensee's license upon the expiration of the 3060-day period
Page 3

licensee's license upon the expiration of the 3060-day period
HB114 INTRODUCED
85 set out abovein subdivision(1) if the licensee fails to either
86 provide the new or additional bond requested by the department
87 or timely appeal to the Alabama Tax Tribunal.
88 (d)(1) Any surety on an existing bond furnished by a
89 licensee may notify the department in writing of its intent to
90 cancel the bond. The department shall immediately notify the
91 licensee of the intent of the surety to cancel the surety
92 bond, and the licensee shall have 3060 days from the date the
93 notice is mailed by the department to provide a sufficient
94 replacement bond as requested by the department.
95 (2) The department may immediately cancel the
96 licensee's license upon expiration of the 3060-day period set
97 out abovein subdivision(1) if the licensee fails to either
98 provide a new replacement bond as requested by the department
99 or appeal the proposed revocation to the Alabama Tax Tribunal
100 within the 3060 days as allowed by Chapter 2A.
101 (3) The surety requesting to be released shall remain
102 liable for any liability already accrued or which shall accrue
103 during the 3060-day period set out abovein subdivision(1), but
104 shall not be responsible for any liability which accrues after
105 the 3060-day period.
106 (e) A surety providing a bond must be authorized to
107 engage in business within this state. The surety bonds are
108 conditioned upon faithful compliance with this article,
109 including the filing of returns and the payment of all tax
110 prescribed hereinin this article. The commissioner shall
111 approve surety bonds shall be approved by the commissioner as
112 to sufficiencythat are sufficient in content and form, and the
Page 4

to sufficiencythat are sufficient in content and form, and the
HB114 INTRODUCED
113 surety bonds shall indemnify the state against any loss
114 arising from the failure of the licensee to pay, for any
115 cause, the motor fuel excise tax levied by this article.
116 (f) A personal producer of CNG is not required to post
117 a bond."
118 "§40-17-335
119 (a) Upon approval of the application by the department,
120 the applicant shall file with the department a surety bond as
121 herein provided:.
122 (1) Except as provided under subdivision (3), theThe
123 bond amount for an applicant for a license as a supplier,
124 permissive supplier, or terminal operator shall be in the
125 approximate amount of twice the average monthly tax liability,
126 not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000), except as
127 provided under subdivision (3).
128 (2) Except as provided under subdivision (3), theThe
129 bond amount for an applicant for a license as an exporter,
130 blender, importer, or distributor shall be a minimum of two
131 thousand dollars ($2,000) or the approximate amount of twice
132 the average monthly tax liability, whichever is greater,
133 except as provided under subdivision (3).
134 (3) The bond for distributors, suppliers, and
135 permissive suppliers who are licensed with the department on
136 October 1, 2012, shall remain at the amount that is filed with
137 the department on that date, except as provided under
138 subsection (b).
139 (4) For an applicant for a license only as a motor fuel
140 transporter or aviation fuel purchaser, there shall be no
Page 5

transporter or aviation fuel purchaser, there shall be no
HB114 INTRODUCED
141 bond.
142 (5) Only one bond shall be required of an applicant for
143 multiple licenses. Except as provided under subdivision (3),
144 the bond amount shall be based on the highest average monthly
145 tax liability of the separate licenses, but shall cover all
146 licenses.
147 (b) The commissioner may require an additional surety
148 bond from any licensee if: (1)(i) the commissioner determines
149 that the surety on an existing bond is unsatisfactory; (2)(ii)
150 a surety notifies the department that it intends to cancel a
151 bond as provided in subsection (d); or (3)(iii) the
152 commissioner, after reviewing the financial condition of the
153 licensee, determines that the existing bond of the licensee is
154 insufficient in an amount to insure the prompt payment of all
155 excise taxes that are due or may become due the state by the
156 licensee upon the sale or withdrawal of motor fuel. However,
157 in no case shall a new or additional bond be more than two
158 months of average excise tax owed by the licensee.
159 (c) The department shall notify a licensee at his or
160 her last known address by first class U.S. mail or, at the
161 option of the department, certified mail, return receipt
162 requested, that itthe department is requiring sucha new or
163 additional bond for any reason as provided above, and the
164 licensee, within 3060 days from the date suchthe notice is
165 mailed by the department, shall either: (1)(i) file the new or
166 additional bond as requested by the department,; or (2)(ii)
167 file a notice of appeal with the Alabama Tax Tribunal as
168 allowed in Chapter 2B of this title. The department may
Page 6

allowed in Chapter 2B of this title. The department may
HB114 INTRODUCED
169 immediately cancel the licensee's license upon the expiration
170 of the 3060-day period set out above if the licensee fails to
171 either provide the new or additional bond requested by the
172 department or timely appeal to the Alabama Tax Tribunal.
173 (d) Any surety on an existing bond furnished by a
174 licensee may notify the department in writing of its intent to
175 cancel the bond. The department shall immediately notify the
176 licensee of the intent of the surety to cancel and the
177 licensee shall have 3060 days from the date the notice is
178 mailed by the department to provide a sufficient replacement
179 bond as requested by the department. The department may
180 immediately cancel the licensee's license upon expiration of
181 the 3060-day period set out above if the licensee fails to
182 either provide a new replacement bond as requested by the
183 department or appeal the proposed revocation to the Alabama
184 Tax Tribunal within the 3060 days as allowed by Chapter 2B of
185 this title. The surety requesting to be released shall remain
186 liable for any liability already accrued or which shall accrue
187 during the 3060-day period set out above, but shall not be
188 responsible for any liability which accrues after the 3060-day
189 period.
190 (e) A surety providing a bond must be authorized to
191 engage in business within this state. The surety bonds are
192 conditioned upon faithful compliance with the provisions of
193 this article, including the filing of returns and the payment
194 of all tax prescribed hereinin this article. The commissioner
195 shall approve surety bonds shall be approved by the
196 commissioner as to sufficiencythat are sufficient in content
Page 7

commissioner as to sufficiencythat are sufficient in content
HB114 INTRODUCED
197 and form, and the surety bonds shall indemnify the state
198 against any loss arising from the failure of the licensee to
199 pay, for any cause, the motor fuel excise tax levied by this
200 article and Article 12A, Chapter 17 of this title."
201 "§40-17-353
202 (a) Upon the discovery of any motor fuel illegally
203 imported into or illegally transported, delivered, stored, or
204 sold in this state, the commissioner shall order the tank or
205 other storage receptacle in which the motor fuel is located to
206 be seized and locked or sealed until the tax, interest, and
207 penalties levied under this article are assessed and paid.
208 (b) If the assessment for the above tax described in
209 subsection(a) is not paid within 3060 days, the commissioner,
210 in addition to the other remedies in this article, may sell
211 the motor fuel and use the proceeds of the sale to satisfy the
212 assessment due, with any excess funds after payment of the
213 assessment and costs of the sale being returned to the owner
214 of the motor fuel.
215 (c) All motor fuel and any property, tangible or
216 intangible, which is found upon the person or in any vehicle
217 which the person is using, including the vehicle itself, to
218 transport or sell illegally transported, delivered, stored,
219 sold, imported, or acquired motor fuel, and any property found
220 in the immediate vicinity, including motor vehicles, tanks,
221 and other storage devices, used to aid in the illegal
222 transportation or sale of motor fuel, shall be considered
223 contraband and shall be forfeited to this state."
224 Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 8